Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 1
ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY — HEALTH

Sec.

§ 39-101. Short title.

Sections 39-101 through 39-130, Idaho Code, may be known and cited as the “Idaho Environmental Protection and Health Act.”

§ 39-102. State policy on environmental protection.

It is hereby recognized by the legislature that the protection of the environment and the promotion of personal health are vital concerns and are therefore of great importance to the future welfare of this state. It is therefore declared to be the policy of the state to provide for the protection of the environment and the promotion of personal health and to thereby protect and promote the health, safety and general welfare of the people of this state.

The goal of the legislature in enacting the ground water quality protection act of 1989 shall be to maintain the existing high quality of the state’s ground water and to satisfy existing and projected future beneficial uses including drinking water, agricultural, industrial and aquacultural water supplies. All ground water shall be protected as a valuable public resource against unreasonable contamination or deterioration. The quality of degraded ground water shall be restored where feasible and appropriate to support identified beneficial uses.

In enacting this law, the legislature intends to prevent contamination of ground water from point and nonpoint sources of contamination to the maximum extent practical. In attaining the goals enumerated in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the legislature wishes to enumerate the following ground water quality protection goals:

It is the policy of the state to prevent contamination of ground water from any source to the maximum extent practical.

The discovery of any contamination that poses a threat to existing or projected future beneficial uses of ground water shall require appropriate actions to prevent further contamination. These actions may consist of investigation and evaluation or enforcement actions if necessary to stop further contamination or clean up existing contamination as required under the environmental protection and health act.

All persons in the state should conduct their activities so as to prevent the nonregulated release of contaminants into ground water.

Education of the citizens of the state is necessary to preserve and restore ground water quality.

It is the policy of the state to protect ground water and to allow for the extraction of minerals above and within ground water. A mine operator shall protect current and projected future beneficial uses of ground water at a point of compliance designated pursuant to rules of the department. Degradation of ground water is allowed at a point of compliance if the mine operator implements the level of protection during mining activities appropriate for the aquifer category.

§ 39-102A. Legislative intent in creating department of environmental quality.

The legislature finds and declares that:

The creation and establishment of the department of environmental quality to protect human health and the environment as its sole mission is in the public’s interest;

That all existing, but no new rights, powers, duties, budgets, funds, contracts, rulemaking proceedings, administrative proceedings, contested cases, civil actions, and other matters relating to environmental protection as described in this chapter, vested in the director of the department of health and welfare and the board of health and welfare on January 1, 2000, shall be transferred to the board of environmental quality, the department of environmental quality and its director as described herein effective July 1, 2000;

That protecting environmental values including, but not limited to, clean air, water and soil, reducing or eliminating environmental pollution arising from human activities, ensuring the proper treatment, storage and disposal of hazardous wastes and ensuring the proper cleanup and restoration of existing natural resources are vital interests of the state of Idaho;

That it is in the interest of the state and its citizens to establish a department of environmental quality to carry out programs to protect human health and the environment, to enforce environmental laws and develop pollution prevention, compliance assistance and other environmental incentive programs;

That the goals to protect human health and the environment can be best achieved by vesting responsibility for environmental protection as specified herein in a state department which has as its sole mission, protection for human health and the environment for the state of Idaho and its residents;

The legislature further intends that environmental quality programs be promulgated and managed such that the benefits of pollution control measures have a reasonable relationship to the public health costs, private property rights, environmental, economic and energy impacts of such measures, provided that this section does not require the preparation of any economic, environmental or other statement;

That the department of environmental quality shall utilize the designated program appropriations made to the department of health and welfare for environmental program functions, the division of environmental quality and the INEEL oversight program for fiscal year 2001.

§ 39-103. Definitions.

Whenever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Air contaminant” or “air contamination” means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of any dust, fume, mist, smoke, radionuclide, vapor, gas or other gaseous fluid or particulate substance differing in composition from or exceeding in concentration the natural components of the atmosphere.

“Air pollution” means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of any contaminant or combination thereof in such quantity of such nature and duration and under such conditions as would be injurious to human health or welfare, to animal or plant life, or to property, or to interfere unreasonably with the enjoyment of life or property.

“Board” means the board of environmental quality.

“Cyanidation” means the method of extracting target precious metals from ores by treatment with cyanide solution, which is the primary leaching agent for extraction.

“Cyanidation facility” means that portion of a new ore processing facility, or a material modification or a material expansion of that portion of an existing ore processing facility that utilizes cyanidation and is intended to contain, treat, or dispose of cyanide containing materials including spent ore, tailings, and process water.

“Department” means the department of environmental quality.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental quality or the director’s designee.

“Emission” means any controlled or uncontrolled release or discharge into the outdoor atmosphere of any air contaminant or combination thereof. Emission also includes any release or discharge of any air contaminant from a stack, vent or other means into the outdoor atmosphere that originates from an emission unit.

“Laboratory” means not only facilities for biological, serological, biophysical, cytological and pathological tests, but also facilities for the chemical or other examination of materials from water or other substances.

“Medical waste combustor” means any device, incinerator, furnace, boiler or burner, and any and all appurtenances thereto, which burns or pyrolyzes medical waste consisting of human or animal tissues, medical cultures, human blood or blood products, materials contaminated with human blood or tissues, used or unused surgical wastes, used or unused sharps, including hypodermic needles, suture needles, syringes and scalpel blades.

“Person” means any individual, association, partnership, firm, joint stock company, trust, estate, political subdivision, public or private corporation, state or federal governmental department, agency or instrumentality, or any other legal entity which is recognized by law as the subject of rights and duties.

“Public water supply” or “public drinking water system” means a system for the provision to the public of water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances, if such system has at least fifteen (15) service connections, regardless of the number of water sources or configuration of the distribution system, or regularly serves an average of at least twenty-five (25) individuals daily at least sixty (60) days out of the year. Such term includes any collection, treatment, storage and distribution facilities that are under the control of the operator of such system and used primarily in connection with such system, and any collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under such control that are used primarily in connection with such system. Such term does not include any special irrigation district.
(13) “Solid waste” means garbage, refuse, radionuclides and other discarded solid materials, including solid waste materials resulting from industrial, commercial and agricultural operations and from community activities but does not include solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage or other significant pollutants in water resources, such as silt, dissolved or suspended solids in industrial waste water effluents, dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or other common water pollutants.

“Solid waste” means garbage, refuse, radionuclides and other discarded solid materials, including solid waste materials resulting from industrial, commercial and agricultural operations and from community activities but does not include solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage or other significant pollutants in water resources, such as silt, dissolved or suspended solids in industrial waste water effluents, dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or other common water pollutants.

“Solid waste disposal” means the collection, storage, treatment, utilization, processing or final disposal of solid waste.

“State” means the state of Idaho.

“Substantive” means that which creates, defines or regulates the rights of any person or implements, interprets or prescribes law or policy, but does not include statements concerning only the internal management of the department and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the public.

“Water pollution” is such alteration of the physical, thermal, chemical, biological or radioactive properties of any waters of the state, or such discharge of any contaminant into the waters of the state as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful or detrimental or injurious to public health, safety or welfare or to domestic, commercial, industrial, recreational, esthetic or other legitimate uses or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish or other aquatic life.

“Waters” means all accumulations of water, surface and underground, natural and artificial, public and private or parts thereof which are wholly or partially within, flow through or border upon this state except for private waters as defined in section 42-212, Idaho Code.

§ 39-104. Department of environmental quality — Creation.

There is created and established in the state government a department of environmental quality which shall for the purposes of section 20, article IV, of the constitution of the state of Idaho be an executive department of the state government. The executive and administrative power of this department shall be vested in the director of the department who shall be appointed and serve at the pleasure of the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate.

The department shall be organized in such administrative divisions or regions as may be necessary in order to efficiently administer the department. Each division shall be headed by an administrator who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director.

The INL coordinator, deputy director, regional administrators and division administrators shall be nonclassified employees exempt from the provisions of chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code.

No provision of this title shall be interpreted as to supersede, abrogate, injure or create rights to divert or store water and apply water to beneficial uses established under section 3, article XV of the constitution of the state of Idaho and title 42, Idaho Code. Nothing in this title shall be construed to allow the department to establish a water right for minimum stream flows or a water right for minimum water levels in any lakes, reservoirs or impoundments. Minimum stream flows and minimum water levels may only be established pursuant to chapter 15, title 42, Idaho Code.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to allow the department to establish or require minimum stream flows which would prevent any water from being diverted for irrigation purposes pursuant to existing water rights, or to establish or require minimum water levels in any lakes, reservoirs or impoundments in which any water is stored for irrigation purposes which would adversely affect existing water rights or contracts with the federal government.

§ 39-104b. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-104c. Transfer of powers to administrator of department of environmental and community services. [Repealed.]

§ 39-104A. Authority to make rules regulating large swine feeding operations — Financial assurances.

The state of Idaho is experiencing the development of large swine feeding operations which are inadequately controlled through existing state regulatory mechanisms. If not properly regulated, these facilities pose a threat to the state’s surface and ground water resources. Due to existing rulemaking authority, the department of environmental quality is in the best position of all state agencies to modify its present rules and to make new rules to develop an adequate regulatory framework for large swine feeding operations.

The department of environmental quality is authorized to modify its existing administrative rules and to make new rules regulating large swine feeding operations, as they shall be defined by the department. The department is authorized to work with the Idaho department of agriculture in the development of such rules.

Owners and operators of swine facilities required to obtain a permit from the department of environmental quality to construct, operate, expand or close the facilities shall provide financial assurances demonstrating financial capability to meet requirements for operation and closure of the facilities and remediation. Requirements for financial assurances shall be determined by the agency as set forth in rule. Financial assurances may include any mechanism or combination of mechanisms meeting the requirements established by agency rule including, but not limited to, surety bonds, trust funds, irrevocable letters of credit, insurance and corporate guarantees. The mechanism(s) used to demonstrate financial capability must be legally valid, binding and enforceable under applicable law and must ensure that the funds necessary to meet the costs of closure and remediation will be available whenever the funds are needed. The director may retain financial assurances for up to five (5) years after closure of a facility to ensure proper closure and remediation, as defined by rule.

Those swine facilities described in section 39-7905, Idaho Code, shall meet the requirements of section 39-7907, Idaho Code, in addition to the requirements of this chapter and the department of environmental quality’s rules regulating swine facilities, prior to the issuance of a final permit by the director. The director shall require that swine facilities be constructed in a phased manner over a period of time and that no additional facilities be constructed until the director approves the associated waste treatment system.

Nothing in this section prohibits the boards of county commissioners of any county or the governing body of any city from adopting regulations that are more stringent or that require greater financial assurances than those imposed by the department of environmental quality. A board of county commissioners of a county or a governing body of a city in which a swine facility is located may choose to determine whether the facility is properly closed according to imposed standards or may leave that determination to the department. This choice shall be communicated to the director in writing when closure begins; provided that determinations of closure by a board of county commissioners of a county or a governing body of a city in which the swine facility is located shall not permit closure under less stringent requirements than those imposed by the department.

As used in this section:
(a) “Animal unit” means a unit equaling two and one-half (2.5) swine, each weighing over twenty-five (25) kilograms (approximately fifty-five (55) pounds), or ten (10) weaned swine, each weighing under twenty-five (25) kilograms. Total animal units are calculated by adding the number of swine weighing over twenty-five (25) kilograms multiplied by four-tenths (.4) plus the number of weaned swine weighing under twenty-five (25) kilograms multiplied by one-tenth (.1).

“Animal unit” means a unit equaling two and one-half (2.5) swine, each weighing over twenty-five (25) kilograms (approximately fifty-five (55) pounds), or ten (10) weaned swine, each weighing under twenty-five (25) kilograms. Total animal units are calculated by adding the number of swine weighing over twenty-five (25) kilograms multiplied by four-tenths (.4) plus the number of weaned swine weighing under twenty-five (25) kilograms multiplied by one-tenth (.1)

(c) “Large swine feeding operations” means swine facilities having a one-time animal unit capacity of two thousand (2,000) or more animal units.

(d) “One-time animal unit capacity” means the maximum number of animal units that a facility is capable of housing at any given time.

§ 39-105. Powers and duties of the director.

The director shall have the following powers and duties:

All of the rights, powers and duties regarding environmental protection functions vested in the department of health and welfare, and its director, administered by the division of environmental quality, including, but not limited to, those provided by chapters 1, 4, 30, 36, 44, 58, 65, 66, 70, 71, 72 and 74, title 39, Idaho Code. The director shall have all such powers and duties as described in this section as may have been or could have been exercised by his predecessors in law, and shall be the successor in law to all contractual obligations entered into by predecessors in law. All hearings of the director shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

The director shall, pursuant and subject to the provisions of the Idaho Code and the provisions of this act, formulate and recommend to the board rules as may be necessary to deal with problems related to water pollution, air pollution, solid waste disposal, and licensure and certification requirements pertinent thereto, which shall, upon adoption by the board, have the force of the law relating to any purpose which may be necessary and feasible for enforcing the provisions of this act, including, but not limited to, the prevention, control or abatement of environmental pollution or degradation including radionuclides and risks to public health related to any of the powers and duties described in this section. Any such rule may be of general application throughout the state or may be limited as to times, places, circumstances or conditions in order to make due allowance for variations therein.

The director, under the rules adopted by the board, shall have the general supervision of the promotion and protection of the environment of this state. The powers and duties of the director shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The issuance of licenses and permits as prescribed by law and by the rules of the board promulgated hereunder. For each air quality operating permit issued under title V of the federal clean air act and its implementing regulations, the director shall, consistent with the federal clean air act and its implementing regulations, expressly include a provision stating that compliance with the conditions of the permit shall be deemed compliance with the applicable requirements of the federal clean air act and the title V implementing regulations. The director may develop and issue general permits covering numerous similar sources, as authorized by 40 CFR 70.6(d), as may be amended, and as appropriate.

The enforcement of rules relating to public water supplies and to administer the drinking water loan fund pursuant to chapter 76, title 39, Idaho Code, including making loans to eligible public drinking water systems as defined in the federal safe drinking water act, as amended, and to comply with all requirements of the act, 42 U.S.C. 300f et seq. and regulations promulgated pursuant to the act. This includes, but is not limited to: the development of and implementation of a capacity development strategy to ensure public drinking water systems have the technical, managerial and financial capability to comply with the national primary drinking water regulations; and the enhancement of protection of source waters for public drinking water systems.

The establishment of liaison with other governmental departments, agencies and boards in order to effectively assist other governmental entities with the planning for the control of or abatement of environmental pollution. All of the rules adopted by the board hereunder shall apply to state institutions.

The supervision and administration of a system to safeguard air quality and for limiting and controlling the emission of air contaminants.

The supervision and administration of a system to safeguard the quality of the waters of this state including, but not limited to, the enforcement of rules relating to the discharge of effluent into the waters of this state and the storage, handling and transportation of solids, liquids, and gases that may cause or contribute to water pollution. For purposes of complying with the clean water act, the director may provide an exemption from additional reductions for those nonpoint sources that meet the applicable reductions set forth in an approved TMDL as defined in chapter 36, title 39, Idaho Code.

The supervision and administration of administrative units whose responsibility shall be to assist and encourage counties, cities, other governmental units, and industries in the control of and/or abatement of environmental pollution.

The administration of solid waste disposal site and design review in accordance with the provisions of chapter 74, title 39, Idaho Code, and chapter 4, title 39, Idaho Code, and in particular as follows:

The issuance of a solid waste disposal site certificate in the manner provided in chapter 74, title 39, Idaho Code.

Provide review and approval regarding the design of solid waste disposal facilities and ground water monitoring systems and approval of all applications for flexible standards as provided in 40 CFR 258, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 74, title 39, Idaho Code.

Cooperating and coordinating with operational monitoring of solid waste disposal sites by district health departments pursuant to authority established in chapters 4 and 74, title 39, Idaho Code.

The authority granted to the director pursuant to provisions of this subsection shall be effective upon enactment of chapter 74, title 39, Idaho Code, by the legislature.

The authority to develop and propose rules as necessary to supplement details of compliance with the solid waste facilities act and applicable federal regulations, provided that such regulations shall not conflict with the provisions of this act nor shall such regulations be more strict than the requirements established in federal law or in the solid waste facilities act.

Programs within the department to utilize the data obtained from such monitoring, and any other relevant data, in the enforcement of applicable agreements, statutes and rules pertaining to such facilities and programs to review, analyze and participate in remedial decisions and other proposed actions and projects to ensure the protection of public health and the environment.

The establishment, administration and operation of:

A network of environmental monitoring stations, independent of the United States department of energy, within and around the facilities of the Idaho national laboratory to provide authoritative auditing and analysis of emissions, discharges or releases of pollutants to the environment, including the air, water and soil from such facilities; and

The enhancement and protection of source waters of the state pursuant to rules of the board.

The director, when so designated by the governor, shall have the power to apply for, receive on behalf of the state, and utilize any federal aid, grants, gifts, gratuities, or moneys made available through the federal government, including, but not limited to, the federal water pollution control act, for use in or by the state of Idaho in relation to health and environmental protection.

The director shall have the power to enter into and make contracts and agreements with any public agencies or municipal corporation for facilities, land, and equipment when such use will have a beneficial or recreational effect or be in the best interest in carrying out the duties imposed upon the department.
(5)(a) The director shall have the power to enter into and make contracts and agreements with any public agencies or municipal corporation for facilities, land, and equipment when such use will have a beneficial or recreational effect or be in the best interest in carrying out the duties imposed upon the department.

The director shall also have the power to enter into contracts for the expenditure of state matching funds for local purposes. This subsection will constitute the authority for public agencies or municipal corporations to enter into such contracts and expend money for the purposes delineated in such contracts.

The director is authorized to adopt an official seal to be used on appropriate occasions, in connection with the functions of the department or the board, and such seal shall be judicially noticed. Copies of any books, records, papers and other documents in the department shall be admitted in evidence equally with the originals thereof when authenticated under such seal.

The director shall also monitor the implementation of agreements between the United States and the state of Idaho related to the operation and environmental protection obligations of the Idaho national laboratory and provide periodic information to the governor, the attorney general, the legislature and the people of Idaho concerning compliance with such agreements and obligations. The director shall have the power to enter into agreements with the United States department of energy in order to carry out the duties and authorities provided in this subsection.
(i) The enforcement of all laws, rules, regulations, codes and standards relating to environmental protection and health.

§ 39-106. Director — Additional powers and duties — Transfer and continuation of rules and other proceedings.

The director shall exercise the following powers and duties in addition to all other powers and duties inherent in the position:

Prescribe such policies and procedures as may be necessary for the administration of the department, the conduct and duties of the employees, the orderly and efficient management of department business, and the custody, use and preservation of department records, papers, books and property belonging to the state.

Employ such personnel as may be deemed necessary, prescribe their duties and fix their compensation within the limits provided by the state personnel system law.

Administer oaths for all purposes required in the discharge of his duties.

Prescribe the qualifications of all personnel of the department on a nonpartisan merit basis, in accordance with the Idaho personnel system law, provided, however, that the administrators in charge of any division of the department shall serve at the pleasure of the director.

Create such units, sections and subdivisions as are or may be necessary for the proper and efficient functioning of the department.

All books, records, papers, documents, property, real and personal, unexpended appropriations and pending business in any way pertaining to the rights, powers and duties regarding environmental protection functions vested in the department of health and welfare and its director, administered by the division of environmental quality, are transferred to and vested in the department and its director. The department established by this act is empowered to acquire, by purchase or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the department is needful for the operation of the facilities and programs for which it is responsible and to dispose of, by sale or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the department is not needful for the operation of the same.

All rules, standards, plans, licenses, permits, consent orders, compliance schedules, certification, and other agreements pertaining to environmental protection functions administered by the division of environmental quality heretofore adopted or issued by the department of health and welfare and its director are transferred to the department of environmental quality and shall remain in full force and effect until superseded. The terms “department” and “director” in such documents shall mean the department of environmental quality and its director, until such documents are amended.

The department of environmental quality and its director shall be the successor to all rights, powers and duties of the department of health and welfare and its director regarding all rulemaking proceedings, administrative proceedings, contested cases, civil actions, contracts, delegations, authorizations and other matters pertaining to environmental protection functions.

§ 39-107. Board — Composition — Officers — Compensation — Powers — Subpoena — Depositions — Review — Rules.

The board of environmental quality shall consist of seven (7) members who shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. The members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. Each member of the board shall be a citizen of the United States, a resident of the state of Idaho, and a qualified elector, and shall be appointed to assure appropriate geographic representation of the state of Idaho. Not more than four (4) members of the board shall be from any one (1) political party. Two (2) members of the board shall be chosen with due regard to their knowledge and interest in solid waste; two (2) members shall be chosen for their knowledge of and interest in air quality; two (2) members shall be chosen for their knowledge of and interest in water quality; and one (1) member shall be chosen with due regard for his knowledge of and interest in air, water and solid waste issues.
(1)(a) The board of environmental quality shall consist of seven (7) members who shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. The members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. Each member of the board shall be a citizen of the United States, a resident of the state of Idaho, and a qualified elector, and shall be appointed to assure appropriate geographic representation of the state of Idaho. Not more than four (4) members of the board shall be from any one (1) political party. Two (2) members of the board shall be chosen with due regard to their knowledge and interest in solid waste; two (2) members shall be chosen for their knowledge of and interest in air quality; two (2) members shall be chosen for their knowledge of and interest in water quality; and one (1) member shall be chosen with due regard for his knowledge of and interest in air, water and solid waste issues.

The members of the board of environmental quality shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years. In appointing members whose terms begin in 2000, the governor shall designate three (3) members to be appointed for a term of three (3) years, two (2) members appointed for a term of four (4) years, and two (2) members appointed for a term of two (2) years. Successors to the members appointed for a term of less than four (4) years shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years thereafter.

The board annually shall elect a chairman, a vice chairman, and a secretary, and shall hold such meetings as may be necessary for the orderly conduct of its business, and such meetings shall be held from time to time on seventy-two (72) hours’ notice of the chairman or a majority of the members. Five (5) members shall be necessary to constitute a quorum at any regular or special meeting and the action of the majority of members present shall be the action of the board. The members of the board shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(h), Idaho Code.

The board, in furtherance of its duties under this act and under its rules, shall have the power to administer oaths, certify to official acts, and to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony. The board may, if a witness refuses to attend or testify, or to produce any papers required by such subpoenas, report to the district court in and for the county in which the proceeding is pending, by petition, setting forth that due notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of said witnesses, or the production of said papers, that the witness has been properly summoned, and that the witness has failed and refused to attend or produce the papers required by this subpoena before the board, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him in the course of said proceedings, and ask an order of said court compelling the witness to attend and testify and produce said papers before the board. The court, upon the petition of the board, shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place to be fixed by the court in such order, the time to be not more than ten (10) days from the date of the order, and then and there shall show cause why he has not attended and testified or produced said papers before the board. A copy of said order shall be served upon said witness. If it shall appear to the court that said subpoena was regularly issued by the board and regularly served, the court shall thereupon order that said witness appear before the board at the time and place fixed in said order, and testify or produce the required papers. Upon failure to obey said order, said witness shall be dealt with for contempt of court.

The director, his designee, or any party to the action may, in an investigation or hearing before the board, cause the deposition or interrogatory of witnesses or parties residing within or without the state, to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions and interrogatories in civil actions in the district court of this state, and to that end may compel the attendance of said witnesses and production of books, documents, papers and accounts.

Any person aggrieved by an action or inaction of the department shall be afforded an opportunity for a fair hearing upon request therefor in writing pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and the rules promulgated thereunder. In those cases where the board has been granted the authority to hold such a hearing pursuant to a provision of the Idaho Code, the hearing may be conducted by the board at a regular or special meeting, or the board may designate hearing officers, who shall have the power and authority to conduct hearings in the name of the board at any time and place. In any hearing, a member of the board or hearing officer designated by it, shall have the power to administer oaths, examine witnesses, and issue in the name of the board subpoenas requiring the testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence relevant to any matter in the hearing.

Any person adversely affected by a final determination of the board, may secure judicial review by filing a petition for review as prescribed under the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The petition for review shall be served upon the chairman of the board, the director of the department, and upon the attorney general of the state of Idaho. Such service shall be jurisdictional and the provisions of this section shall be the exclusive procedure for appeal.

The board, by the affirmative vote of four (4) of its members, may adopt, amend or repeal the rules, codes, and standards of the department, that are necessary and feasible in order to carry out the purposes and provisions of this act and to enforce the laws of this state.

All rulemaking proceedings and hearings of the board shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

The board shall adopt contested case rules that are consistent with the rules adopted by the attorney general under section 67-5206(4), Idaho Code, the provisions of this act and other statutory authority of the department.

All rules, permits and other actions heretofore adopted, issued or taken by the board of health and welfare pertaining to the environmental protection functions administered by the division of environmental quality shall remain in full force and effect until superseded.

The board of environmental quality shall be the successor to all rights, powers and duties of the board of health and welfare regarding all rulemaking proceedings, administrative proceedings, contested cases, civil actions, contracts, delegations, authority and other matters pertaining to environmental protection functions administered by the division of environmental quality.

Upon creation of the board of environmental quality, all pending business before the board of health and welfare relating to environmental protection functions administered by the division of environmental quality shall be transferred to and determined by the board of environmental quality.

The rules and orders so adopted and established shall have the force and effect of law and may deal with any matters deemed necessary and feasible for protecting the environment of the state.